Hawaii statutes.
[§46-172] Civil actions for false claims.
The county corporation counsel or county attorney shall investigate any
violation under section 46-171. If the corporation counsel or county attorney
finds that a person has violated or is violating section 46-171, the
corporation counsel or county attorney may bring a civil action under this
section. [L 2001, c 227, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next